Louisiana, session 2026, HB1229.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 20-B of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:1780.1, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 20-B: SOCIAL MEDIA USE FOR MINORS
§1780.1 Social media use for minors
A. As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Account holder" means a resident who opens an account or creates a
profile or is identified by the social media platform by a unique identifier while using
or accessing a social media platform when the social media platform knows or has
reason to believe the resident is located in this state.
(2) "Daily active users" means the number of unique users in the United
States who used the online forum, website, or application at least eighty percent of
the days during the previous twelve months, or, if the online forum, website, or
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1374 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1229
application did not exist during the previous twelve months, the number of unique
users in the United States who used the online forum, website, or application at least
eighty percent of the days during the previous month.
(3) "Resident" means a person who lives in this state for more than six
months of the year.
(4)(a) "Social media platform" means an online forum, website, or
application that satisfies each of the following criteria:
(i) Allows users to upload content or view the content or activity of other
users.
(ii) Ten percent or more of the daily active users who are younger than
sixteen years of age spend on average two hours per day or longer on the online
forum, website, or application on the days when using the online forum, website, or
application during the previous twelve months or, if the online forum, website, or
application did not exist during the previous twelve months, during the previous
month.
(iii) Employs algorithms that analyze user data or information on users to
select content for users.
(iv) Has any of the following addictive features:
(aa) Infinite scrolling, which means either continuously loading content, or
content that loads as the user scrolls down the page without the need to open a
separate page or seamless content, or the use of pages with no visible or apparent end
or page breaks.
(bb) Push notifications or alerts sent by the online forum, website, or
application to inform a user about specific activities or events related to the user’s
account.
(cc) Displays personal interactive metrics that indicate the number of times
other users have clicked a button to indicate their reaction to content or have shared
or reposted the content.
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1374 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1229
(dd) Auto-play video or video that begins to play without the user first
clicking on the video or on a play button for that video.
(ee) Live-streaming or a function that allows a user or advertiser to broadcast
live video content in real-time.
(b) The term does not include an online service, website, or application
where the exclusive function is e-mail or direct messaging consisting of text,
photographs, pictures, images, or videos shared only between the sender and the
recipients, without displaying or posting publicly or to other users not specifically
identified as the recipients by the sender.
B.(1) A social media platform shall prohibit a minor who is younger than
fourteen years of age from entering into a contract with a social media platform to
become an account holder.
(2) A social media platform shall do all of the following:
(a) Terminate any account held by an account holder younger than fourteen
years of age, including accounts that the social media platform treats or categorizes
as belonging to an account holder who is likely younger than fourteen years of age
for purposes of targeting content or advertising, and provide ninety days for an
account holder to dispute such termination. Termination shall be effective upon the
expiration of the ninety days if the account holder fails to effectively dispute the
termination.
(b) Allow an account holder younger than fourteen years of age to request
to terminate the account. Termination shall be effective within five business days
after such request.
(c) Allow the confirmed parent or guardian of an account holder younger
than fourteen years of age to request that the minor’s account be terminated.
Termination shall be effective within ten business days after such request.
(d) Permanently delete all personal information held by the social media
platform relating to the terminated account, unless there are legal requirements to
maintain such information.
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1374 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1229
C.(1) A social media platform shall prohibit a minor who is fourteen or
fifteen years of age from entering into a contract with a social media platform to
become an account holder, unless the minor’s parent or guardian provides consent
for the minor to become an account holder.
(2) A social media platform shall do all of the following:
(a) Terminate any account held by an account holder who is fourteen or
fifteen years of age, including accounts that the social media platform treats or
categorizes as belonging to an account holder who is likely fourteen or fifteen years
of age for purposes of targeting content or advertising, if the account holder’s parent
or guardian has not provided consent for the minor to create or maintain the account.
The social media platform shall provide ninety days for an account holder to dispute
such termination. Termination shall be effective upon the expiration of the ninety
days if the account holder fails to effectively dispute the termination.
(b) Allow an account holder who is fourteen or fifteen years of age to request
to terminate the account. Termination shall be effective within five business days
after such request.
(c) Allow the confirmed parent or guardian of an account holder who is
fourteen or fifteen years of age to request that the minor’s account be terminated.
Termination shall be effective within ten business days after such request.
(d) Permanently delete all personal information held by the social media
platform relating to the terminated account, unless there are legal requirements to
maintain such information.
D. If a court enjoins the enforcement of Subsection C of this Section or
would otherwise enjoin enforcement of any other provision of this Section due to
Subsection C of this Section, then Subsection C of this Section shall be severed, and
the following shall come into effect:
(1) A social media platform shall prohibit a minor who is fourteen or fifteen
years of age from entering into a contract with a social media platform to become an
account holder.
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1374 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1229
(2) A social media platform shall do all of the following:
(a) Terminate any account held by an account holder who is fourteen or
fifteen years of age, including accounts that the social media platform treats or
categorizes as belonging to an account holder who is likely fourteen or fifteen years
of age for purposes of targeting content or advertising, and provide ninety days for
an account holder to dispute such termination. Termination shall be effective upon
the expiration of ninety days if the account holder fails to effectively dispute the
termination.
(b) Allow an account holder who is fourteen or fifteen years of age to request
to terminate the account. Termination shall be effective within five business days
after such request.
(c) Allow the confirmed parent or guardian of an account holder who is
fourteen or fifteen years of age to request that the minor’s account be terminated.
Termination shall be effective within ten business days after such request.
(d) Permanently delete all personal information held by the social media
platform relating to the terminated account, unless there are legal requirements to
maintain such information.
E. Any knowing or reckless violation of Subsection B or C, or, if in effect,
Subsection D of this Section is deemed an unfair and deceptive trade practice
actionable pursuant to R.S. 51:1401 et. seq., solely by the attorney general against
a social media platform. If the attorney general has reason to believe that a social
media platform is in violation of Subsection B or C, or, if in effect, Subsection D of
this Section, the attorney general, as the enforcing authority, may bring an action
against such platform for an unfair or deceptive trade practice. In addition to other
remedies pursuant to R.S. 51:1401 et. seq., the attorney general may set and collect
a civil penalty of up to five thousand dollars per violation and reasonable attorney
fees and court costs. When the social media platform’s failure to comply with
Subsection B or C, or, if in effect, Subsection D of this Section is a consistent pattern
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1374 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1229
of knowing or reckless conduct, punitive damages may be assessed against the social
media platform.
F.(1) A social media platform that knowingly or recklessly violates
Subsection B or C, or, if in effect, Subsection D of this Section is liable to the minor
account holder, including court costs and reasonable attorney fees as ordered by the
court.
(2) A civil action for a claim pursuant to this Subsection shall be brought
within one year from the date the complainant knew, or reasonably should have
known, of the alleged violation.
(3) Any action brought pursuant to this Subsection may only be brought on
behalf of a minor account holder.
G. For purposes of bringing an action pursuant to this Section, a social media
platform that allows a minor account holder younger than fourteen years of age or
a minor account holder who is fourteen or fifteen years of age to create an account
on such platform is considered to be both engaged in substantial and not isolated
activities within this state and operating, conducting, engaging in, or carrying on a
business and doing business in this state, and is therefore subject to the jurisdiction
of the courts of this state.
H. If a social media platform allows an account holder to use the social
media platform, the parties have entered into a contract.
I. This Section does not preclude any other available remedy at law or
equity.
J. The attorney general may promulgate rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement this Chapter.
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1374 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1229